District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.13

Reports and records.

Every employer, employment agency, and labor organization, subject both to this chapter and to title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended, is to furnish to the Office, all reports that may be required by the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission established under the Civil Rights Act of 1964.

History

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 213, 24 DCR 6038

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2514.
1973 Ed., § 6-2223.